Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4520
Violations; administrative penalty.

In addition to any other penalties provided by the laws of this state, any insurer or agent found by the director to have violated the Long-Term Care Insurance Act or any rule or regulation shall be subject to an administrative penalty of up to three times the amount of any commissions paid for each policy involved in the violation or up to ten thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 52.